Maine, session 132, LD899.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2910-A, sub-§4, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 182, §1, is
amended to read:
B. Medical payments coverage in a casualty insurance policy is assignable only by
written agreement between the insured and the casualty insurer on a form prescribed
or approved by the superintendent. Benefits under medical payments coverage must
be applied as directed by the insured.
Page 1 - 132LR0627(03)